Massachusetts, session 194th, H1331.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
WHEREAS, innovative technologies have revolutionized society and specifically
financial markets, and investing, and
WHEREAS, for the first time, millions of new investors from previously underserved
communities and demographics, including; women, people of color, and first-generation
Americans have access to tools and resources to begin investing for the future, and
WHEREAS, overburdensome and unnecessary regulations may reverse historic trends of
investor participation, and
WHEREAS, many young people graduate from high school without having basic
financial literacy or money management skills, and
of 4

WHEREAS, the Legislature finds that, in light of economic challenges nationwide, sound
financial management skills are vitally important to students in the Commonwealth, particularly
high school students, and
WHEREAS, the Legislature also finds that requiring educational instruction in financial
literacy and money management as a prerequisite to high school graduation will better prepare
young people in this state for adulthood by providing them with the requisite knowledge to
achieve financial stability and independence, and
WHEREAS, 22 states in the nation require financial literacy instruction as a prerequisite
for high school graduation and a standard high school diploma.
SECTION 1. This Act may be cited as the FINANCIAL INNOVATIVE
TECHNOLOGIES ACT (FIT ACT)
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, as
of the effective date of this Act, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission’s Regulation Best
Interest (Reg BI) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 shall be the operative standard of
conduct for broker-dealers and associated persons when they make a recommendation to a retail
customer of any securities transaction or investment strategy involving securities, including
recommendations of types of accounts. Further, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission’s
interpretations concerning investment advisers’ standard of conduct under the Investment
Advisers Act of 1940, and the "solely incidental" prong of the broker-dealer exclusion from the
Advisers Act shall hereby govern.
of 4

SECTION 3. Section 1R of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof
the following subsection:-
(a) Financial literacy standards established pursuant to section 1D shall promote an
understanding of personal finances including, but not limited to: (i) loans; (ii) interest and
interest accrual; (iii) using credit and making investments, risks of various financial instruments
and basic diversification of assets; (iv) online commerce; (v) rights and responsibilities of renting
or buying a home or making other large purchases or investments; (vi) saving, investing and
planning for retirement; (vii) the role of banking and financial services; (viii) balancing ledgers
and checkbooks; (ix) state and federal taxes; (x) charitable giving; (xi) evaluating media content,
including online content, that relates to personal finance matters; (xii) saving, investing and
planning for higher education or professional training (xiii) earning and spending income,
methods of payment, consumer protection, and budgeting; (xiv) protecting and insuring assets,
preventing identity theft and avoiding online scams; and (xv) emerging technologies in the
financial industry, a basic understanding of cryptocurrencies, online commerce and computer
stock-trading, how to evaluate digital media content relating personal finance matters and how to
recognize risk.
SECTION 4. Sais section 1R of Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking paragraph (b) and replacing it with the following:-
(b) A school district, charter school, approved private day or residential school or
collaborative school shall incorporate the financial literacy standards established pursuant to
of 4

section 1D and subsection (a) into existing curriculum including, but not limited to, mathematics,
history and social sciences, technology or business.
SECTION 5. Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following new section:-
Section 100. (a) In all public schools, financial literacy shall be taught as required
subjects to promote an understanding of personal finances and financial stability. Instruction
shall include (i) loans; (ii) interest and interest accrual; (iii) credit card debt; (iv) online
commerce; (v) rights and responsibilities of renting or buying a home; (vi) saving, investing and
planning for retirement; (vii) the role of banking and financial services; (viii) balancing a
checkbook; (ix) state and federal taxes; (x) charitable giving; (xi) evaluating media content,
including online content, that relates to personal finance matters; (xii) saving, investing and
planning for higher education or professional training training; (xiii) earning and spending
income, methods of payment, consumer protection, and budgeting; (xiv) protecting and insuring
assets, preventing identity theft and avoiding online scams; and (xv) emerging technologies in
the financial industry, a basic understanding of cryptocurrencies, online commerce and computer
stock-trading, how to evaluate digital media content relating personal finance matters and how to
recognize risk.
of 4